Colorado, session 2026A, HB1118.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add part 26 to article
2 of title 2 as follows:
PART 26
COLORADO-IRELAND INTERNATIONAL TRADE
COMMISSION
2-2-2601. Colorado-Ireland international trade commission -
creation - membership - duties - report.
(1) Commission created. THERE IS CREATED THE COLORADO-
IRELAND INTERNATIONAL TRADE COMMISSION, REFERRED TO IN THIS
SECTION AS THE "COMMISSION", IN THE COLORADO OFFICE OF ECONOMIC
DEVELOPMENT.
(2) (a) Membership. THE COMMISSION CONSISTS OF THE
FOLLOWING ELEVEN MEMBERS:
(I) EIGHT VOTING MEMBERS APPOINTED AS FOLLOWS:
(A) TWO MEMBERS OF THE SENATE, WITH ONE MEMBER OF THE
MAJORITY PARTY APPOINTED BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE AND ONE
MEMBER OF THE MINORITY PARTY APPOINTED BY THE MINORITY LEADER
OF THE SENATE;
(B) TWO MEMBERS OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES, WITH ONE
-2- HB26-1118

MEMBER OF THE MAJORITY PARTY APPOINTED BY THE SPEAKER OF THE
HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES AND ONE MEMBER OF THE MINORITY PARTY
APPOINTED BY THE MINORITY LEADER OF THE HOUSE OF
REPRESENTATIVES;
(C) ONE INDIVIDUAL WHO IS RECOGNIZED FOR THEIR
ACHIEVEMENTS AND EXPERIENCE IN INTERNATIONAL BUSINESS, APPOINTED
BY THE GOVERNOR;
(D) ONE INDIVIDUAL WHO IS ACTIVE IN IRISH-AMERICAN
CULTURAL AND CIVIC AFFAIRS, WITH A PREFERENCE FOR AN INDIVIDUAL
WITH A HISTORY OF COOPERATION IN THE LEGISLATIVE PROCESS,
APPOINTED BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE;
(E) ONE INDIVIDUAL WHO IS ACTIVE IN ONE OR MORE STATE
INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION WHO HAS AN INTEREST IN
COLORADO-IRELAND TRADE RELATIONS, APPOINTED BY THE COLORADO
COMMISSION ON HIGHER EDUCATION; AND
(F) ONE INDIVIDUAL WHO REPRESENTS BUSINESS AND ECONOMIC
DEVELOPMENT INTERESTS APPOINTED BY THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE OF
THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL; AND
(II) THREE VOTING EX OFFICIO MEMBERS AS FOLLOWS:
(A) ONE MEMBER OF THE SENATE WHO IS THE CHAIR OF THE STATE,
VETERANS, AND MILITARY AFFAIRS COMMITTEE OF THE SENATE OR ITS
SUCCESSOR COMMITTEE, OR THE CHAIR'S DESIGNEE;
(B) ONE MEMBER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES WHO IS THE
CHAIR OF THE STATE, CIVIC, MILITARY, AND VETERANS AFFAIRS
COMMITTEE OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OR ITS SUCCESSOR
COMMITTEE, OR THE CHAIR'S DESIGNEE; AND
(C) THE DIRECTOR OF THE COLORADO OFFICE OF ECONOMIC
-3- HB26-1118

DEVELOPMENT, OR THE DIRECTOR'S DESIGNEE.
(b) THE MEMBERS APPOINTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(a)(I)
OF THIS SECTION SHALL SERVE TERMS OF THREE YEARS AND ARE ELIGIBLE
FOR REAPPOINTMENT TO THE COMMISSION FOLLOWING THE EXPIRATION OF
THEIR TERMS.
(c) ALL APPOINTMENTS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (2)(a)(I) OF
THIS SECTION SHALL BE MADE NO LATER THAN AUGUST 31, 2026. IN
MAKING APPOINTMENTS TO THE COMMISSION, THE APPOINTING
AUTHORITIES SHALL MAKE REASONABLE EFFORTS TO ENSURE THAT THE
COMMISSION MEMBERSHIP IS INCLUSIVE AND REFLECTS THE GEOGRAPHIC
AND DEMOGRAPHIC DIVERSITY OF THE STATE.
(d) MEMBERS OF THE COMMISSION APPOINTED PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (2)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION SERVE AT THE PLEASURE OF THE
APPLICABLE APPOINTING AUTHORITY OR UNTIL THE MEMBER NO LONGER
SERVES IN THE POSITION FOR WHICH THAT MEMBER WAS APPOINTED TO
THE COMMISSION. IF A VACANCY OCCURS, THE APPROPRIATE APPOINTING
AUTHORITY SHALL APPOINT A REPLACEMENT MEMBER WHO MEETS THE
REQUIREMENTS SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION (2)(a)(I) OF THIS SECTION FOR
THE VACANT POSITION NOT LATER THAN NINETY DAYS FROM THE DATE
THE VACANCY IS DEEMED TO EXIST.
(e) MEMBERS OF THE COMMISSION SERVE WITHOUT
COMPENSATION AND ARE NOT ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR TRAVEL
EXPENSES OR OTHER EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR WORK ON THE
COMMISSION.
(3) Meetings.
(a) THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES SHALL CALL
THE FIRST MEETING OF THE COMMISSION, TO BE HELD NO LATER THAN
-4- HB26-1118

SEPTEMBER 1, 2026, AT WHICH THE MEMBERS SHALL ELECT A CHAIR AND
VICE-CHAIR FROM AMONG THE LEGISLATIVE MEMBERSHIP AND ASSIGN
STUDY AND REPORTING RESPONSIBILITIES TO THE MEMBERS.
(b) THE COMMISSION SHALL POST ON THE WEBSITE OF THE
COLORADO OFFICE OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT A NOTICE OF ALL
MEETINGS, THE NAME OF EACH MEMBER SERVING ON THE COMMISSION,
AND A COPY OF ALL REPORTS AND RECOMMENDATIONS PRODUCED BY THE
COMMISSION.
(c) THE COMMISSION SHALL MEET AT LEAST TWICE PER YEAR.
(d) A QUORUM FOR A MEETING IS SIX MEMBERS.
(e) THE COMMISSION MAY MEET BY ELECTRONIC MEANS,
INCLUDING FOR ITS FIRST MEETING.
(4) Duties. THE PURPOSE OF THE COMMISSION IS TO:
(a) ADVANCE BILATERAL TRADE AND INVESTMENT BETWEEN
COLORADO AND IRELAND;
(b) ENCOURAGE MUTUAL INVESTMENT IN COLORADO AND
IRELAND, ESPECIALLY IN INFRASTRUCTURE AND HUMAN CAPITAL;
(c) PROMOTE BUSINESS, EDUCATIONAL, AND CULTURAL
EXCHANGES BETWEEN COLORADO AND IRELAND;
(d) TAKE JOINT ACTION ON POLICY ISSUES OF MUTUAL AGREEMENT
BETWEEN COLORADO AND IRELAND; AND
(e) ADDRESS OTHER ISSUES AS DETERMINED NECESSARY BY THE
COMMISSION.
(5) Reports.
(a) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 15, 2027, AND ON OR BEFORE
JANUARY 15 EACH YEAR THEREAFTER, THE COMMISSION SHALL SUBMIT A
REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY AND THE GOVERNOR. THE REPORT
-5- HB26-1118

MUST INCLUDE:
(I) THE NUMBER OF TIMES THE COMMISSION MET DURING THE
PRECEDING TWELVE MONTHS;
(II) THE MINUTES OF THE COMMISSION'S MEETINGS; AND
(III) ANY RECOMMENDATIONS OR REQUESTS THAT MAY ASSIST THE
COMMISSION'S WORK.
(b) NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), THE
REPORTING REQUIREMENT IN THIS SUBSECTION (5) CONTINUES
INDEFINITELY.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-6- HB26-1118